Alaska statutes. Title 39. Public Officers and Employees.
Article 4. Prohibitions.

Sec. 39.25.160.
Prohibitions generally.

A classified employee may not take an active part in the management of a political party above the precinct level.

A person may not give, render, pay, offer, solicit, or accept money, services, or other valuable thing in connection with securing or making an appointment, promotion, or advantage in a position in the classified service.

A person may not require an assessment, subscription, contribution, or service for a political party from a state employee.

A person may not seek or attempt to use a political party endorsement in connection with an appointment or promotion in the classified service.

An employee in the classified, partially exempt, or exempt service who seeks nomination or becomes a candidate for state or national elective political office shall immediately resign any position held in the state service. The employee’s position becomes vacant on the date the employee files a declaration of candidacy for state or national elective office. This subsection applies to employees in the exempt service, except those listed below, notwithstanding AS

39.25.110

. This subsection does not apply to

justices, judges, magistrates, and employees of the judicial branch, including employees of the judicial council;

the governor or the lieutenant governor;

a member of the legislature;

an employee seeking election as a delegate to a constitutional convention;

officers and employees of the University of Alaska;

certificated teachers and noncertificated employees employed by a regional educational attendance area established and organized under AS

14.08.031

—

14.08.041

to teach in, administer, or operate schools under the control of a regional educational attendance area school board;

certificated teachers employed as correspondence teachers, teachers in skill centers operated by the Department of Education and Early Development, or teachers at Mt. Edgecumbe School;

members of boards and commissions and authorities if the member is not entitled to compensation other than per diem and travel for service on the board, commission, or authority;

emergency firefighting personnel employed by the Department of Natural Resources for a fire emergency or for fire prevention and related activities conducted under AS

41.15.030

;

youth employed by the Department of Natural Resources under the Youth Employment and Student Intern programs;

students employed by the state institutions in which the students are enrolled;

persons engaged in employment or pre-employment training programs operated by the Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs;

a participant in the Alaska temporary assistance program under AS 47.27 who holds a temporary position with the state in order to obtain job training or experience.

Action affecting the employment status of a state employee or an applicant for state service, including appointment, promotion, demotion, suspension, or removal, may not be taken or withheld on the basis of unlawful discrimination due to race, religion, color, national origin, age, disability, sex, marital status, change in marital status, pregnancy, or parenthood. In addition, action affecting the employment status of an employee in the classified service, including appointment, promotion, demotion, suspension, or removal, may not be taken or withheld for a reason not related to merit.

Action affecting the employment status of an employee in the classified service or an applicant for a position in the classified service, including appointment, promotion, demotion, suspension, or removal, may not be taken or withheld on the basis of unlawful discrimination due to political beliefs.

A person may not knowingly make a false statement, mark, rating, or report with regard to an assessment, certification, or appointment made under this chapter or in any manner commit a fraud preventing the impartial execution of this chapter and the personnel rules adopted under this chapter.

A person may not obstruct the right of another person to assessment, eligibility, certification, appointment, or promotion under this chapter.

A state employee, whether in the classified, partially exempt, or exempt service, may not campaign on behalf of a political candidate on government time. This subsection does not prohibit the employees of the division of elections from carrying out duties related to elections or the members and employees of the commission on judicial conduct from carrying out duties relating to the evaluation of justices and judges. This subsection does not apply to the governor and lieutenant governor and members of the legislature.

A person may not be employed in the classified, partially exempt, or exempt service unless the person has complied with the military selective service registration requirements imposed under 50 U.S.C. App. 453 (Military Selective Service Act), if those requirements were applicable to the person. Notwithstanding AS

39.25.110

, this subsection applies to employees in the exempt service except

a justice, a judge, or a magistrate;

the governor or the lieutenant governor;

a member of the legislature;

a person appointed under art. III, sec. 25, or art. III, sec. 26, Constitution of the State of Alaska.

A state employee may not intentionally (1) fail to give, or (2) direct, order, threaten, restrain, coerce, force, or prevent another person from giving, full cooperation to the legislative auditor or the legislative fiscal analyst in assembling or furnishing requested information to the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee or its staff if the person did not reasonably believe that the action or failure to act was legally justified. Violation of this subsection constitutes just cause for dismissal or other appropriate disciplinary action.

History.

(§ 19 ch 144 SLA 1960; am § 38 ch 71 SLA 1972; am § 1 ch 15 SLA 1975; am § 16 ch 112 SLA 1982; am §§ 67, 68 ch 74 SLA 1998; am §§ 10, 11 ch 111 SLA 2000; am § 4 ch 89 SLA 2002; am § 5 ch 67 SLA 2003; am § 7 ch 114 SLA 2003; am § 20 ch 25 SLA 2006; am § 29 ch 22 SLA 2015)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in (e) of this section, “Department of Education” was changed to “Department of Education and Early Development” in accordance with § 89, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2003, in the last sentence of subsection (

l

), “this section” was changed to “this subsection” to correct a manifest error in ch. 67, SLA 2003.

Cross references. —

For offense of hindering the legislative budget and audit committee, see AS

11.56.845

.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective May 15, 2015, in (c)(1), substituted “justices” for “a justice” at the beginning.

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 6, ch. 89, SLA 2002, subsection (k) applies to a person who seeks employment with the state on or after January 1, 2004.

Subsection (k) of this section refers to 50 U.S.C. App 453 which was renumbered in 2015 as 50 U.S.C. 3802 by the U.S. House of Representatives, Office of Law Revision Counsel.